Mississippi, session 2026, SB2292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-13-56, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-13-56.  (1)  For purposes of this section, "civics" means a nonpartisan educational program that promotes: (a)  The acquisition of knowledge of the history, heritage, civic life and civic institutions of the United States of America and the State of Mississippi; (b)  The acquisition of skills such as the ability to analyze texts and determine the reliability of sources; and (c)  An understanding of the ways in which civic institutions operate and how individuals may be involved in civic life. (2)  Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, every public and charter school within the state shall be required to teach standalone civics courses as part of the required curriculum for high school graduation.  Training for the teaching of these civics courses shall be conducted during the summer of 2027.  Each school shall require students to complete regular courses of instruction in the factually accurate history of the United States, in civics, in the Constitution of the United States and in the Constitution and the government of the State of Mississippi starting in the eighth grade and before students complete twelfth grade.  The courses shall focus on fostering and perpetuating the ideals, principles and spirit of political and economic democracy in the United States of America and increasing the knowledge of the organization of the government of the United States and of the State of Mississippi.  The courses shall have an emphasis on the study of federalism, the separation of powers, the checks and balances throughout the government, the Bill of Rights, and appreciation for free speech and civil discourse, using historical references, congressional and public debates, including current public policy issues.  The courses shall also increase the critical thinking skills of the students in how and why the separate branches of government operate as they do. (3)  The State Department of Education, using rigorous and relevant resources, shall prescribe the courses of study, including the basic course requirements and the academic standards for these courses, and shall update course standards to align with current civics scholarship.  The department shall rename its United States Government courses as "United States Government and Civics" to account for the additional civics component while maintaining the government component. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.